Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.151

Sample ballots.

Except in each county with a population of one million or more, on or before the fifteenth day before a primary or election, the county auditor shall prepare a sample ballot which shall be made readily available to members of the public. The secretary of state shall adopt rules governing the preparation of sample ballots in counties with a population of one million or more. The rules shall permit, among other alternatives, the preparation of more than one sample ballot by a county with a population of one million or more for a primary or election, each of which lists a portion of the offices and issues to be voted on in that county. The position of precinct committee officer shall be shown on the sample ballot for the primary, but the names of candidates for the individual positions need not be shown.

[ 2004 c 271 s 131.]